Washington statutes.
RCW 19.30.180

Injunctions—Costs—Attorney fee.

The director or any other person may bring suit in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin any person from using the services of an unlicensed farm labor contractor or to enjoin any person acting as a farm labor contractor in violation of this chapter, or any rule adopted under this chapter, from committing future violations. The court may award to the prevailing party costs and disbursements and a reasonable attorney fee.

[ 1985 c 280 s 12.]